Utah statutes.
23-19-38.2.   Refunds for armed forces or public health or safety organization members -- Criteria.

(1)  A member of the United States Armed Forces or public health or public safety organization who is mobilized or deployed on order in the interest of national defense or emergency and is precluded from using a purchased license, certificate, tag, or permit, may, as provided in Subsection (2):

(a)  receive a refund from the division; and

(b)  if the person has drawn a permit, have all opportunities to draw that permit in a future draw reinstated.

(2)  To qualify, the person or a legal representative must:

(a)  notify the division within a reasonable amount of time that the person is applying for a refund;

(b)  surrender the license, certificate, tag, or permit to the division; and

(c)  furnish satisfactory proof to the division that the person:

(i)  is a member of:

(A)  the United States Armed Forces;

(B)  a public health organization; or

(C)  a public safety organization; and

(ii)  was precluded from using the license, certificate, tag, or permit as a result of being called to active duty.

(3)  The Wildlife Board may adopt rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, necessary to administer this section including allowing retroactive refund to September 11, 2001.

